Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RONDO COMMUNITY LAND TRUST.new text end new text begin $11,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the Rondo Community Land Trust. The grant recipient must use grant money for a home buyer initiative pilot program. Activities funded with the appropriation must be affordable for households whose adjusted income is 115 percent of the area median income or below as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end